Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-134
Discriminatory practices; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person who directly or indirectly refuses, withholds from, denies, or attempts to refuse, withhold, or deny, to any other person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, services, or privileges, or who segregates any person in a place of public accommodation on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, ancestry, or military or veteran status, shall be guilty of discriminatory practice and shall be subject to the penalties of sections 20-132 to 20-143.

(2) It is not a discriminatory practice under sections 20-132 to 20-143 for a person or a place of public accommodation to, on an otherwise nondiscriminatory basis, limit admission or service to veterans or servicemembers or their family members or provide discounts or other benefits to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 3;

Laws 1974, LB 681, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 10.